District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

50-1703.02

Child Passenger Safety Fund.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-194, § 4b
as added Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-212, § 2(b), 49 DCR 8137
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 9095, 58 DCR 6226